Hawaii statutes.
PART XIV.
SPECIAL RULES FOR MOTORCYCLES

[§291C-151] Traffic laws apply to persons
operating motorcycles. Every person operating a motorcycle shall be
granted all of the rights and shall be subject to all of the duties applicable
to the driver of any other vehicle under this chapter, except as to special
regulations in this part and except as to those provisions of this chapter
which by their nature can have no application. [L 1971, c 150, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next